Hawaii, session 2026, GM1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that, due to insurance
clairas for losses to state facilities and other state property
damaged or destroyed in Lahaina by the 2023 Maui wildfires, the
State has received property and liability proceeds that are
intended to be used to repair, rebuild, and restore impacted
state facilities and infrastructure. The legislature further
finds that the expenditure of funds from the state risk
management revolving fund is subject to legislative
appropriation and expenditure limits, and that an increase to
the fund's expenditure ceiling is necessary to allow the timely
use of these insurance proceeds for the rebuilding of state
facilities in Lahaina.
The legislature also finds that rebuilding efforts in
Lahaina involve multiple state agencies, the county of Maui, and
private entities. Absent coordinated planning between these
parties, rebuilding efforts may occur within silos and result in
duplicate work and funding, extended timelines, and inefficient
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx
HillilllilHMIIIiMllllllll

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
use of limited public and private resources. Without a master
coordinated project plan, critical state rebuilding projects
that could be funded through the state risk management revolving
fund may proceed through the traditional capital improvement
project process, which may impact funding for other critical
projects in the State and reduce the State's ability to fully
utilize available insurance proceeds in the state risk
management revolving fund for disaster-related losses to state
facilities.
The legislature additionally finds that the development of
a master coordinated project plan for the rebuilding of Lahaina,
in collaboration with the relevant state agencies, the county of
Maui, and other appropriate private entities, will enable the
State to align projects, map shared infrastructure needs,
identify opportunities to leverage shared resources, and
conserve and maximize the insurance proceeds in the state risk
management revolving fund. The legislature notes that this
master coordinated project plan should be a condition precedent
to the authorization of an increase to the expenditure ceiling
of the state risk management revolving fund for the recovery of
Lahaina to ensure that, to the fullest extent practicable,
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
HinillllHiHllllllNIIHini

Pages S.B. NO. " ■
C.D. 1
moneys in the fund are leveraged to rebuild all state facilities
in Lahaina and the rebuilding is financed.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Increase the expenditure ceiling and appropriate funds
out of the state risk management revolving fund to
enable the department of accounting and general
services, state risk management and insurance
administration to expend and distribute property and
liability insurance proceeds related to the 2023 Maui
wildfires for the rebuilding and restoration of state
facilities in Lahaina, including funds specifically
for:
(A) The King Kamehameha III elementary school;
(B) Offsite infrastructure surrounding the King
Kamehameha III elementary school;
(C) Roadways surrounding the King Kamehameha III
elementary school; and
(D) The Lahaina small boat harbor;
(2) Require the department of accounting and general
services to submit to the legislature a master
coordinated project plan developed in collaboration
2026-2474 SB2930 GDI SMA-l.docx 3
liiHiiiiiniuiiiiiHnBiinaiHiH

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
with certain state agencies and in consultation with
the county of Maui and other relevant entities;
(3) Require the department of education to transfer to the
school facilities authority exclusive site control
over the new King Kamehameha III elementary school
property during the period of its construction, and
the department of accounting and general services to
transfer to the school facilities authority any
materials deemed necessary for the construction of the
school and provide further support as necessary upon
request;
(4) Require the school facilities authority to submit
monthly progress reports to the governor and
legislature; and
(5) Allow the governor to transfer certain authorities and
responsibilities related to the construction of King
Kamehameha III elementary school from the school
facilities authority to another state agency under
certain conditions.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the state risk
management revolving fund established by section 41D-4, Hawaii
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiiiimiiiiHiiiiiiiHiiiiiin

Page 5 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Revised Statutes, the sum of $146,000,000 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the planning,
design, construction, and appurtenances for the King Kamehameha
III elementary school; provided that this appropriation is
contingent upon at least $48,000,000 being matched by federal
funds; provided further that any funds reimbursed shall be
returned to the fund from which the original expenditure was
made.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the school
facilities authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the state risk
management revolving fund established by section 41D-4, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, the sum of $30,000,000 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the planning,
design, construction, and appurtenances of offsite
infrastructure improvements surrounding the King Kamehameha III
elementary school.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the school
facilities authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the state risk
management revolving fund established by section 41D-4, Hawaii
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx
lilllinMlllllllMlllllilOIIIII

Page 6 S.B. NO.
CD. 1
Revised Statutes, the sum of $12,000,000 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the roadways
surrounding the King Kamehameha III elementary school, including
for planning, design, construction, and appurtenances.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
transportation for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the state risk
management revolving fund established by section 41D-4, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, the sum of $12,000,000 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the design and
construction of piers, loading docks, electrical systems,
pavement resurfacing, and appurtenances necessary to restore the
Lahaina small boat harbor damaged by the 2023 Maui wildfires.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. The department of accounting and general
services shall submit to the legislature a master coordinated
project plan for all projects funded by moneys appropriated out
of the state risk management revolving fund that represent a
transfer and distribution of property and liability insurance
proceeds related to the 2023 Maui wildfires. The department of
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
iiiniHMiiHiHiiiminiin

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
accounting and general services shall develop the master
coordinated project plan in collaboration with the following
state agencies:
(1) The department of land and natural resources' division
of boating and ocean recreation;
(2) The department of education;
(3) The department of transportation;
(4) The school facilities authority; and
(5) Any other state agency the department of accounting
and general services deems necessary;
provided that the department of education and school facilities
authority, in conjunction with the comptroller, shall consult
with the county of Maui and any other relevant entities deemed
necessary to outline the infrastructure redevelopment of Lahaina
and help facilitate a master coordinated project plan that will
allow all involved agencies and relevant entities to participate
in a meaningful and coordinated rebuilding of Lahaina.
SECTION 7. During the period of construction of the King
Kamehameha III elementary school, the department of education
shall transfer exclusive site control over the new school
property to the school facilities authority; provided that
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx 7
iiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiMiiiini

Page 8 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
exclusive site control shall revert to the department of
education upon the completion of construction of the elementary
school.
Within thirty days after the effective date of this Act,
the department of accounting and general services shall transfer
to the school facilities authority all existing plans, designs,
documents, active contracts, and any other materials deemed
necessary for the construction of the King Kamehameha III
elementary school. The department of accounting and general
services shall, upon request of the school facilities authority,
provide technical assistance, consultation, and other support
services as necessary to facilitate the transition,
construction, and continued development of the King Kamehameha
III elementary school.
SECTION 8. (a) The school facilities authority shall
submit a monthly milestone progress report to the governor and
legislature no later than five days after the end of each month;
provided that the report shall include:
(1) Critical path items;
(2) Project timelines;
(3) Key construction milestones; and
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiiiniiiininMiiiiiiiiH

Page 9
S B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Actions necessary to secure matching or supplemental
funds to ensure the timely completion of the King
Kamehameha III elementary school.
(b) If the governor, upon consultation with the
comptroller, determines that the school facilities authority is
at risk of failing to meet the deadlines necessary to obtain
matching or supplemental funds, the governor may transfer
expending authority, exclusive site control, and project
management responsibilities related to the construction of King
Kamehameha III elementary school, in whole or in part, from the
school facilities authority to the department of accounting and
general services, of another appropriate state agency.
SECTION 9. No moneys appropriated for a project under this
Act shall be available for expenditure until funding for the
entire cost for the respective project has been made available,
as determined by the comptroller.
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2474 SB2930 CDl SMA-l.docx 9
inniiiBiiiniiMiinHiiiiiii

2930
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026

S.B. No. 2930, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
228-26

SB No. 2930, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
------------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives